Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 7. Soil and Water Conservation Cost-Share Program.

§ 69-27-301.
Definitions.

The following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Commission” shall mean the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

“District” or “soil and water conservation district” means a governmental subdivision of the state and a public body , corporate and politic, organized in accordance with the provisions of Section 69-27-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purposes, with the powers and subject to the restrictions hereinafter set forth.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Agency of this state” includes the government of this state and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the government of this state.

“United States” or “agencies of the United States” includes the United States of America, the United States Department of Agriculture, and any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Government” or “governmental” includes the government of this state, the government of the United States, and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Landowner” or “owner of land” includes any person, firm, or corporation who shall hold legal or equitable title to any lands lying within a soil and water conservation district.

“Land operator” or “operator of land” includes any person, firm or corporation, other than the owner, who shall be in possession of any lands lying within a soil and water conservation district whether as lessee, renter, tenant or otherwise.

“Eligible lands” shall mean lands owned or leased by a private individual, group or association, and lands owned by the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof.

“Cost-share assistance” shall mean partial financial assistance in such amounts as the commission, in its discretion, shall determine, subject to the limitations as set by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

“Approved practice” means those farming practices or operations that are carried out in a manner that will directly benefit the conservation, development or proper utility of soil and water resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-303.
Administration of program.

The commission shall serve as the administrator of the provisions of this act and shall serve as the disbursing agency for funds to be expended from and deposited to the credit of the Soil and Water Cost-Share Program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-305.
Authority to employ personnel and procure supplies.

The commission and districts are authorized to employ such professional and clerical assistance and obtain such supplies and equipment as needed to implement this program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-307.
Rulemaking powers.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary for the implementation of the Mississippi Soil and Water Cost-Share Program. The commission is authorized to conduct public hearings or otherwise seek the advice, counsel and recommendations of interested owners, associations, industrialists or other persons or groups. Adequate notice of any public hearing must be provided within the general area of the site of the hearing. The commission shall publish such rules and regulations and shall make the same available upon request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-308.
Participation in water quality cost-share project.

For a district commissioner to participate in any water quality cost-share project funded directly or indirectly by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the district board of which the commissioner is a member shall not participate in the proposal, development, planning, advisory or implementation phases of the project. The Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall make all decisions without the involvement of the district board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch 378, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1996).

§ 69-27-309.
Use of funds appropriated for commission.

The commission is authorized to use money appropriated therefor to assist in implementing approved practices on a cost-sharing basis on eligible lands in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-311.
Implementation of program; recovery of improperly used grants.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties to implement the provisions of the Mississippi Soil and Water Cost-Share Program:

To determine which approved practices shall be eligible for cost-share assistance;

To establish maximum sums and cost-share rates which any one eligible landowner or land operator may receive for implementation of an approved practice;

To review periodically the costs of establishing conservation practices and to make such adjustment as, in the discretion of the commission, is necessary.

Upon request of the commission, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall institute proper legal proceedings to recover any or all of the cost-share assistance provided an eligible landowner or land operator if the commission shall determine that the landowner or land operator failed to implement any portion of or all of the practice approved by the commission for such landowner or land operator, and if the commission determines that legal proceedings are necessary and proper.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-313.
Application for assistance; consideration by commission.

Any eligible landowner or land operator who wishes to receive cost-share assistance shall file an application with the soil and water conservation district stating the practice to be implemented. Upon the receipt of an application, the district shall:

Make a need and feasibility determination;

Inform the landowner or land operator of the result of the needs and feasibility study and inform the landowner or land operator as to what practice is approved for installation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 69-27-315.
Application to state-owned lands.

Any agency, department, board, commission or other subdivision of government of the State of Mississippi, or any political subdivision thereof, is authorized to implement an approved practice on any lands owned by such political entity or owned by the State of Mississippi and supervised or managed by such entity. The governing authorities of such entity shall engage the assistance of the county conservation district of the county in which the land is located in the preparation of an application for submission to the district. The district shall treat any such political entity as an individual owner for purposes of considering applications, granting cost-share assistance and approving the practice implemented.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 375, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1985.